test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-laullad_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - läullad: # Verb 'to sing' - full paradigm
     läullad+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: lääulam
     läullad+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: lääulak
     läullad+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: läull
     läullad+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: läullap
     läullad+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: läullveʹted
     läullad+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: läulla
     läullad+V+Ind+Prs+Sg4: lääulat
     läullad+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: laullum
     läullad+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: laulluk
     läullad+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: lääulai
     läullad+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [lääulaim, lääulain]
     läullad+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: lääulaid
     läullad+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: laullu
     läullad+V+Ind+Prt+Sg4: laulluš
     läullad+V+Pot+Sg1: lääulžem
     läullad+V+Pot+Sg2: lääulžiǩ
     läullad+V+Pot+Sg3: lääulež
     läullad+V+Pot+Pl1: [lääulžep, lääulžim]
     läullad+V+Pot+Pl2: lääulžid 
     läullad+V+Pot+Pl3: lääulže
     läullad+V+Pot+Sg4: lääulžet
     läullad+V+Pot+ConNeg: lääulže
     läullad+V+Cond+Sg1: lääulčem
     läullad+V+Cond+Sg2: lääulčiǩ
     läullad+V+Cond+Sg3: lääulči
     läullad+V+Cond+Pl1: [lääulčim, lääulčep]
     läullad+V+Cond+Pl2: lääulčid
     läullad+V+Cond+Pl3: lääulče
     läullad+V+Cond+Sg4: lääulčeš
     läullad+V+Cond+ConNeg: lääulče
     läullad+V+Imprt+Sg2: lääul
     läullad+V+Imprt+Sg3: lääulas
     läullad+V+Imprt+Pl1: läullap
     läullad+V+Imprt+Pl2: läullad
     läullad+V+Imprt+Pl3: läullaz
     läullad+V+Imprt+ConNeg: laullu
     läullad+V+Actio+Ess: läullmen
     läullad+V+Actio: läullam
     läullad+V+Act+PrsPrc: läullai
     läullad+V+Act+PrfPrc: läullam
     läullad+V+Pass+PrfPrc: laullum
     läullad+V+VAbess: lääulkani
     läullad+V+Ger+Ess: lääuleen
     läullad+V+Ger+Instr: lääuleeʹl
